Maryland, session 2025, SB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
7–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1029*

SENATE BILL 1029
(a) (1) The personal representative may petition the court for permission to
act in any matter relating to the administration of the estate.
(2) (I) 1. THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE MAY PETITION THE
COURT TO INTERPRET A WILL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT
IF:
A. THE WILL CONTAINS A LEGACY FOR A HEALTH
PROVIDER OR CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IN THE HEALTH SECTOR; AND
B. THE WILL DOES NOT EXPRESSLY PROVIDE THAT THE
LEGACY MUST BE USED TO ADDRESS HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES EVEN THOUGH THE
DECEDENT’S LIFE REFLECTED AN ACTIVE INTEREST IN HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES.
2. A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO PETITIONS A
COURT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL PRESENT EVIDENCE SATISFACTORY TO THE
COURT, INCLUDING EVIDENCE OF ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE DECEDENT DURING THE
DECEDENT’S LIFETIME, TO DEMONSTRATE THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT UNDER
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH THAT THE LEGACY TO THE HEALTH PROVIDER OR
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IN THE HEALTH SECTOR MUST BE USED TO ADDRESS
HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES.
(II) A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE’S PRESENTATION OF
EVIDENCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
CREATE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION AS TO THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT AND
UNLESS EVIDENCE IS PRESENTED TO REBUT THE PRESUMPTION, THE COURT SHALL
INTERPRET THE WILL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT.
(III) 1. FOR THE PERIOD BEGINNING 6 MONTHS AFTER THE
PROBATE OF THE ESTATE AND ENDING 3 YEARS AFTER THE PROBATE OF THE
ESTATE, A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO PETITIONS THE COURT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY REQUIRE A LEGATEE DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1A OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO DEMONSTRATE HOW THE
LEGACY WAS USED BY THE LEGATEE.
2. IF THE LEGATEE FAILS TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE
LEGACY WAS USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERPRETATION OF THE WILL
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE
MAY PETITION THE COURT TO ISSUE:
A. AN ORDER REQUIRING THE BENEFICIARY TO RETURN
THE LEGACY TO THE ESTATE; OR

SENATE BILL 1029 3
B. A JUDGMENT REQUIRING THE LEGATEE TO PAY THE
ESTATE THE VALUE OF THE LEGACY.
(b) The court may pass any order it considers proper.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
1–102.
IT IS THE POLICY OF THE STATE TO OPPOSE AND ALLEVIATE ANY DISPARITY
IN HEALTH OUTCOMES FOR AND AMONG RACIAL GROUPS IN THE STATE RESULTING
FROM THE PROVISION OF TREATMENT OTHERWISE AVAILABLE TO ASSIST THE
PUBLIC IN GENERAL, AND TO ENCOURAGE AND SUPPORT THE MAKING OF GIFTS AND
BEQUESTS CONSISTENT WITH THIS POLICY TO ADDRESS AND ALLEVIATE SUCH
HEALTH DISPARITIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall be
construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any will
probated on or after October 1, 2021.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.